Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-1608
Hearing; notice; requirements.

(1) The commission shall hold a public hearing before issuing a permit.

(2) Notice of the hearing shall be provided in accordance with section 57-911 and commission rules and regulations adopted and promulgated thereunder.

(3) Notice of the hearing shall be given to each mineral lessee, mineral owner, and reservoir estate owner within the storage reservoir and within one-half mile of the storage reservoir's boundaries.

(4) Notice of the hearing shall be given to each surface owner of land overlying the storage reservoir and within one-half mile of the storage reservoir's boundaries.

(5) Notice of the hearing shall be given to any additional persons that the commission requires.

(6) Hearing notices required by this section shall comply with deadlines set by the commission and shall contain the information the commission requires.

Laws 2021, LB650, § 8.
August 28, 2021